District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.04

Classification of beneficial uses of waters.

(a)

At least once every 3 years, the Mayor shall review the water quality standards and if appropriate revise the classification of the beneficial uses of the waters and the criteria for water needed for the particular classes of beneficial uses.

(b)

The classifications and the criteria shall accompany guidelines for preserving the waters for the beneficial uses and for preventing harm to the water quality.

(c)

Before promulgating the classifications, criteria, and guidelines, the Mayor shall consider the environmental, technological, institutional, and socio-economic impact of applying and enforcing them.

(d)

The Mayor shall regularly monitor District waters, according to their classification under subsection (a) of this section, to determine whether the water fulfills the quality standards established under this subchapter.

History

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 5, 32 DCR 919

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-924.